New York, session 2025-2026, S6026.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 837 of the executive law is amended by adding a new 2 subdivision 24 to read as follows: 3 24. Promulgate, in consultation with the commissioner of the office 4 for people with developmental disabilities, a standardized form that may 5 be used by state and local law enforcement agencies as a voluntary 6 registry to help locate persons diagnosed with autism spectrum disor- 7 ders, Alzheimer's disease or other dementia, or who are otherwise unable 8 to communicate and who lose the ability to recognize familiar places or 9 faces. Such form may include identifying information on the missing 10 registrant such as physical features, medical conditions, whether the 11 person is non-verbal, and names of family or friends to contact if the 12 person is located. Such form may also provide for a photograph of the 13 registrant to be submitted with the form. 14 § 2. This act shall take effect on the ninetieth day after it shall 15 have become a law. Effective immediately, the addition, amendment 16 and/or repeal of any rule or regulation necessary for the implementation 17 of this act on its effective date are authorized to be made and 18 completed on or before such effective date. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD06706-01-5